Massachusetts, session 194th, S2590.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 131 of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 6 to 7, the words “has passed an
examination prepared by the board for this purpose;”.
SECTION 2. Section 132 of said chapter 112 is hereby amended by striking out, in lines
1 to 2, the words “Examinations for licensed certified social workers, including those in
independent clinical practice” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- Examinations
for licensed independent clinical social workers.
SECTION 3. Said chapter 112 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 135C
the following section:-
Section 135D. To ensure a stable, diverse workforce of licensed social workers in the
commonwealth, and to provide for increased support and retention of practicing licensed social
workers, the commonwealth shall administer a paid practicum placement grant program for
Master of Social Work students in good standing. The program shall, subject to appropriation,
of 3

provide grant funding to designated recipients with a specific focus on recruiting and retaining
Master of Social Work students from historically marginalized communities and low-income
communities. Funds to establish this program shall be allocated from state, federal or other
dedicated resources, including existing trust funds.
Eligible applicants must attend a school of social work Masters program physically
located in Massachusetts that has been accredited by the Council on Social Work Education.
The executive office of education shall collaborate with eligible institutions of higher
education to track applicant data, including application details submitted, and evaluate the
program’s efficacy and equity.
SECTION 4. Section 136 of said chapter 112 is hereby amended by inserting after the
fourth paragraph the following paragraph:-
Licensed independent clinical social workers engaged in independent clinical practice
who provide one-on-one supervision to a licensed certified social worker, licensed social worker,
Masters of social work intern or Bachelors of social work intern shall be eligible to receive up to
8 continuing education credits during a licensing period for said supervision.
SECTION 5. The executive office of health and human services shall conduct an
evaluation of the impact of removal of the licensing examination requirement for licensed
certified social workers under sections 131 and 132 of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as most
recently amended by section 1 and 2 of this act. The executive office shall contract with an
independent evaluation consultant to perform the evaluation. The evaluation shall include an
analysis of the impact of removing the examination requirement on alleviating shortages of
qualified social workers, providing high-quality patient care, expanding access to quality
of 3

behavioral health services, increasing the diversity of the social worker workforce among diverse
language skills, race, ethnicity and cultural backgrounds and the impact of any increase in
diversity on patient care, particularly for vulnerable populations. In preparing the evaluation, the
consultant shall meet with representatives of organizations representing social workers, social
work education, social work testing, social work patients, behavioral health advocacy
organizations and other groups that may assist the evaluation. The evaluation and analysis shall
be conducted independently of the executive office. The executive office shall submit the
evaluation and associated recommendations pursuant to the removal of the licensing examination
requirement to the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate, the joint committee on
higher education, the joint committee on mental health, substance use and recovery and the
house and senate committees on ways and means not later than July 31, 2028.
SECTION 6. Sections 1 and 2 are hereby repealed.
SECTION 7. Sections 1 and 2 shall take effect on January 1, 2026. Section 6 shall take
effect on December 31, 2030.
of 3